Illinois, session 104th, HB5321.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 524-8.2 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24-8.2 new)7    Sec. 24-8.2. Continuing education coursework used for 8salary increases. 9    (a) In this Section:10    "Continuing education coursework" means any 11graduate-level, degree-eligible credit course taught by an 12instructor of record and completed by a licensed classroom 13teacher for the purpose of salary advancement or other 14compensation-related advancement under a collective bargaining 15agreement, school district employment contract, school board 16policy, or salary schedule. "Continuing education coursework" 17includes professional development sequences that are taken or 18completed and are approved by the State Board of Education or 19an industry-recognized credential, including a credential for 20career and technical educators.21    "Graduate-level, degree-eligible credit" means academic 22credit documented on an official academic transcript through a 23regionally accredited institution of higher education that may   HB5321 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20507 LNS 33980 b1be applied toward a master's degree, education specialist 2degree, or doctoral degree.3    "Instructor of record" means an individual assigned the 4responsibility for academic oversight of a continuing 5education course, including instruction, evaluation and 6feedback of participant work, and the assignment of grades, 7who:8        (1) is a credentialed educator holding a master's 9    degree or higher and is academically qualified to teach 10    the continuing education course, with demonstrated 11    experience in the content area or areas of the continuing 12    education course;13        (2) provides substantive instructional support to a 14    participating licensed classroom teacher throughout the 15    period of continuing education course enrollment; and16        (3) evaluates participant work and provides 17    individualized, written feedback aligned to continuing 18    education course objectives.19    "Licensed classroom teacher" means an individual holding a 20valid and current Professional Educator License under Section 2121B-20. "Licensed classroom teacher" does not include any 22individual who is an administrator or is not covered by a 23collective bargaining agreement pertaining to teachers.24    (b) This Section applies only to licensed classroom 25teachers who have the ability, under the terms of a collective 26bargaining agreement, employment contract, school board   HB5321 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20507 LNS 33980 b1policy, or salary schedule, to achieve salary advancement 2through continuing education coursework.3    (c) Beginning with continuing education coursework 4completed on or after July 1, 2026, a school district, special 5education cooperative, or other public educational employer 6may provide salary advancement to licensed classroom teachers 7for the completion of continuing education coursework. The 8school district, special education cooperative, or other 9public educational employer may recognize continuing education 10coursework for purposes of salary advancement only if the 11continuing education coursework:12        (1) is graduate-level, degree-eligible credit offered 13    through a regionally accredited institution of higher 14    education and documented on an official academic 15    transcript; and16        (2) includes an instructor of record.17    (d) Nothing in this Section requires a school district, 18special education cooperative, or other public educational 19employer to create a salary schedule or salary advancement 20pathway if one does not otherwise exist.21    (e) Nothing in this Section precludes the parties to a 22collectively bargained agreement from negotiating salary 23advancement or other compensation-related advancements under 24the collectively bargained agreement for other negotiated 25actions or activities by a licensed classroom teacher not set 26forth in this Section.  HB5321 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20507 LNS 33980 b1    (f) Implementation of this Section, including standards 2for documentation, transcript verification, institutional 3accreditation, salary advancement, and compliance monitoring, 4shall be determined by each school district, special education 5cooperative, or other public educational employer. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.